Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1323
Sick leave account; balanced as of December 31 each year.

The sick leave account shall be balanced as of 11:59 p.m. Central Standard Time on December 31 each calendar year. Sick leave shall be cumulative for not more than one thousand four hundred forty hours.

Laws 1973, LB 340, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 697, § 5.